Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 6.2 Scenic Enhancement and Rest and Recreation Areas Along Federal Aid Highways

37-6.2-1.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty within and adjacent to federal aid highways within this state and the development of publicly owned rest and recreation areas, sanitary, and other facilities within or adjacent to the right of way of highways for the accommodation of the traveling public promotes the public safety, health, and general welfare.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 59, § 1.

37-6.2-2.
Power of director of transportation to acquire property.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to acquire by gift, purchase, or condemnation, in accordance with chapter 6 of this title, any interest, estate, or right in and to real property adjacent to or within federal aid highways of this state so as to improve strips of land necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty within and adjacent to highways, or for the establishment of publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas, sanitary, and other facilities within or adjacent to the right of way of the highways reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 59, § 1.

37-6.2-3.
Agreements with federal authorities.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with the U.S. secretary of transportation as provided by 23 U.S.C. § 319 relating to landscaping, scenic enhancement, or the establishment of publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas, sanitary, and other facilities reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public in areas within or adjacent to federal aid highways within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 59, § 1.

37-6.2-4.
Severability.

If any section, clause, or provision of this chapter shall be held either unconstitutional or ineffective in whole or in part to the extent that it is not unconstitutional or ineffective, it shall be valid and effective and no other section, clause, or provision shall on account thereof be termed invalid or ineffective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 59, § 1.